Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5229.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 42-64.34 of the General Laws entitled "The Department of Housing"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-64.34-5. Rhode Island housing champion designation.
(a) The department of housing shall develop a Rhode Island housing champion designation
program for all qualifying municipalities. The Rhode Island housing champion designation
program shall be voluntary. Each municipality shall have the option, in its sole discretion, to apply
to the department to receive the Rhode Island housing champion designation. In exchange for
obtaining the Rhode Island housing champion designation, a municipality shall receive preferential
access to state resources including, but not limited to, discretionary state funds, as available.
(b) The department shall adopt rules to establish qualifications and procedures for a
municipality to receive the Rhode Island housing champion designation. The designation procedure
shall be based on a scoring system.
(c) Qualifications to receive the Rhode Island housing champion designation shall include:
(1) Adoption of such land use regulations and ordinances which the department determines
to be necessary to promote the development of housing consistent with the State Guide Plan
housing element, and other types of housing necessary for the economic development of the state.
In this subsection, "land use regulations and ordinances" may include, but are not limited to, zoning
ordinances to innovative land use controls, subdivision and the site plan regulations.

(2) Training of planning and zoning board members using, training materials and programs,
provided by the department that cover the processes, procedures, regulations, and statutes related
to the board on which the member serves; approved by the department.
(3) Planning or implementation of sewer and water infrastructure improvements and/or
electric infrastructure improvements intended to support the development of housing consistent
with the State Guide Plan housing element.
(4) Planning or implementation of sidewalks, bike lanes, or other infrastructure intended
to support walkable or bikeable neighborhoods or public transportation.
(d) Qualifications to receive the Rhode Island housing champion designation may also
include, but are not limited to, adoption of financial tools that incentivize the development of
housing, including adoption of the community revitalization tax relief incentive program and
establishment of municipal economic development and revitalization districts.
(e) Municipalities that receive a Rhode Island housing champion designation, shall
annually report such measures as the department may determine including, but not limited to, land
use board applications, approvals and building permits.
(f) A Rhode Island housing champion designation shall be valid for three (3) years from
the date such designation is awarded. A municipality may seek renewal of its Rhode Island housing
champion designation for subsequent three (3) year periods. The department shall include in the
criteria for renewal performance metrics including, but not limited to, the qualifications listed in
subsection (c) of this section.
(g) Each year the department shall develop a report which describes all actions taken related
to the operation of the Rhode Island housing champion designation program in the preceding state
fiscal year and assesses the overall impact of the Rhode Island housing champion designation
program, including an assessment of the additional housing units produced in the state as a result
of the program's operation and incentives. The report required by this section shall be submitted to
the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president of the senate on or
before November 1 of each year, beginning in 2026, and upon such submission, the report shall be
posted online on the website of the department.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000300/SUB A
========
LC000300/SUB A - Page 2 of 3